<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88113-0066 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-13-88.f2.A1065</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Operating LicensesInvolving No Significant Hazards Considerations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Pursuant to Public Law (P.L.) 97-415, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission(the Commission) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. P.L. 97-415revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, orproposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act.This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediatelyeffective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination bythe Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration,notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearingfrom any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposedto be issued from December 21, 1987 through December 31, 1987. The lastbiweekly notice was published on December 30, 1987 (52 FR 49217). <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATINGLICENSE AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION DETERMINATIONAND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING </ITAG>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendmentrequests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for eachamendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination.Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of thisnotice will be considered in making any final determination. The Commissionwill not normally make a final determination unless it receives a requestfor a hearing. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Rules and Procedures Branch,Division of Rules and Records, Office of Administration and Resource Management,U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and should citethe publication date and page number of this <T4>Federal Register </T4> notice. Written comments may also be deliveredto Room 4000, Maryland National Bank Building, 7735 Old Georgetown Road,Bethesda, Maryland from 8:15 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Copies of written commentsreceived may be examined at the NRC Public Document Room, 1717 H Street,NW., Washington, DC. The filing of requests for hearing and petitions forleave to intervene is discussed below. By February 12, 1988 the licensee may file a request for a hearing withrespect to issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operatinglicense and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceedingand who wishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file awritten petition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and petitionsfor leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part2. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filedby the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board,designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety andLicensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition and theSecretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issuea notice of hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding,and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determinationon the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determinationwill serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significanthazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and makeit immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Anyhearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment involves a significanthazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuanceof any amendment. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expirationof the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change duringthe notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result,for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission mayissue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day noticeperiod, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involvesno significant hazards consideration. The final determination will considerall public and State comments received before action is taken. Should theCommission take this action, it will publish a notice of issuance and providefor opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects thatthe need to take this action will occur very infrequently. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW.,Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during thelast ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitionerpromptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to WesternUnion at (800) 325-6000 (in Missouri (800) 342-6700). The Western Unionoperator should be given Datagram Identification Number 3737 and the followingmessage addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel-Bethesda, U.S. Nuclear RegulatoryCommission, Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee.Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or thepresiding Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application foramendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission'sPublic Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the localpublic document room for the particular facility involved. <ITAG tagnum="84">Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-317 and 50-318,Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Calvert County,Maryland </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 20, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The following proposed TechnicalSpecification (TS) changes are in response to the BGandamp;E applicationdated January 20, 1987. The proposed TS changes: (1) Modify the Unit 1 TS Limiting Condition For Operation (LCO) 3.3.3.2for incore detectors by placing additional restrictions upon operabilityabove those that were required for operation during the previous cycle(Cycle 8), (2) Change the surveillance periods of the Unit 1 and 2 TS SurveillanceRequirements (SRs) 4.1.3.4.c (demonstration of full length control elementassembly (CEA) drop time) and 4.3.3.2.b (incore detector channel calibration)from at least once per 18 months to at least once per refueling interval,where a refueling interval shall be defined as 24 months, (3) Modify the Units 1 and 2 TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.f.3, for cycling fire suppressionwater system flow path valves that are not testable during plant operation,and 4.7.11.4.b, for the inspection, reracking and replacement of degradedcoupling gaskets for fire hoses inside containment, by extending theirassociated surveillance intervals from at least once every 18 months toat least once per refueling interval (24 months), and (4) Renumber the Units 1 and 2 TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.f.3 as 4.7.11.1.1.g.2 andTS SR 4.7.11.1.1.g as 4.7.11.1.1.g.1 and change the Units 1 and 2 TS SRs4.7.11.1.1.g (fire suppression system flow test), 4.7.11.2.b and c (sprayand sprinkler system functional tests), and 4.7.11.4.c (containment firehose stations operability and hydrostatic tests) by making administrativechanges and more restrictive changes to the surveillance requirements.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>Change No. 1 proposes to modify the Unit 1 TS LCO 3.3.3.2 for incoredetector operability by making its provisions more restrictive than thoserequired for Unit 1 Cycle 8 operation. During startup for Unit 1 Cycle8, an unexpectedly large number of incore detector strings failed therebyplacing the Unit close to its operability limits. To provide increasedoperational flexibility for Unit 1 during Cycle 8 operations, the requirementsof TS LCO 3.3.3.2 were relaxed for one cycle only. In order to restoreLCO 3.3.3.2 to its pre-cycle 8 requirements, the following modificationsare proposed: (1) LCO 3.3.3.2.a would require at least eight operable symmetric incoredetector segment groups, with at least two of these detector segment groupsat each of the four axial elevations containing incore detectors, to havesufficient operable detector segments to compute at least two azimuthalpower tilt valves at each of these four axial elevations. During Cycle8, eight symmetric incore detector segment groups of no specified elevationwere required with sufficient operable detector segments to compute atleast two azimuthal power tilt valves at three of the four axial elevations.(2) LCO 3.3.3.2.b would require that at least 75% of all incore detectorsegments be operable for recalibration of the excore neutron flux detectionsystem rather than the 50% required during Cycle 8. (3) LCO 3.3.3.2.c would require, for monitoring the unrodded planar radialpeaking factor, the unrodded integrated radial peaking factor, or the linearheat rate, that at least 75% of all incore detector locations be operablerather than the 50% required during Cycle 8. On March 6, 1986, the NRC published guidance in the <T4>Federal Register </T4> (51 FR 7751) concerning examples of amendmentsthat are not likely to involve a significant hazards consideration. One of the examples, (ii) was ``a change that constitutes an additionallimitation, restriction, or control not presently included in the TechnicalSpecifications.'' This proposal is one such change as the proposed TS LCOmodifications make the operability requirements for incore detectors morerestrictive than those currently specified for Cycle 8. Based upon the above, the NRC staff agrees with the licensee's evaluationand proposes to determine that the proposed changes to TS LCO 3.3.3.2 involveno significant hazards considerations. Change No. 2 proposes to change the surveillance periods from 18 to 24months for the Units 1 and 2 TS surveillance requirements for demonstratingfull length CEA drop time (TS 4.1.3.4.c) and for performing incore detectorchannel calibrations (TS 4.3.3.2.b). The current surveillance period for these tests is 18 months which correspondsto the current refueling cycle. The extension in the surveillance intervalto 24 months is requested to facilitate a 24-month operating cycle. The licensee evaluated the proposed change against the standards in 10CFR 50.92 and has determined that the amendment would not: (i) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated... The licensee has proposed a six-month extension in the surveillance periodof TS 4.1.3.4.c for performing CEA drop time test. Control element assemblydrop time is required to be less than or equal to 3.1 seconds. The CEAdrop time is measured from the time that electrical power is interruptedto a fully withdrawn CEA to the time required for the CEA to be at its90% insertion position. This drop time testing is performed at a reactorcoolant system average temperature greater than or equal to 515anddegrees;F and with all four reactor coolant pumps operating. These conditions arerepresentative of reactor conditions for reactor trips from operating conditions.The purpose of the CEA drop time testing is to ensure that scram insertiontimes are consistent with those used in the safety analyses. Factors whichcould adversely affect the CEA drop times when the surveillance intervalis increased are (1) changes in component clearances, (2) changes in thephysical configuration of the CEA or guide tubes, and (3) the buildup ofcorrosion products and suspended material in the coolant system that couldinterfere with CEA motion. Changes to component clearances and changesin the physical configuration of the CEA or guide tubes are more likelyto occur when the reactor vessel head is removed and when maintenance isperformed on the CEAs (including replacement) and that portion of the drivesystem directly interfacing with a fuel assembly. For these two factors,Surveillance Requirements 4.1.3.4.a and 4.1.3.4.b are applicable and notaffected by the proposed change in the testing interval of SurveillanceRequirement 4.1.3.4.c. Buildup of corrosion products and suspended materialin the coolant system are minimized by coolant chemistry requirements andother controls on the reactor coolant system. In addition, each CEA isexercised at least once per 31 days in accordance with Surveillance Requirement4.1.3.1.2. This testing should detect sticking CEAs and mitigate the proposed6-month extension in the surveillance interval of TS 4.1.3.4.c for demonstratingCEA drop time. Furthermore, each planned or unplanned reactor trip thatmay occur during the extended 24-month operating cycle would provide additionalinformation on CEA drop times and operability, thus, indicating any problemsdeveloping with regards to CEA drop time. To determine the time dependency of CEA drop time with respect to the lengthof the operating cycle, CEA drop time measurements from 15 hot functionaltest data/sets were analyzed. Eight sets of measurements were taken fromUnit 1 and seven from Unit 2. The average CEA drop time for standard fuelassemblies was approximately 2.3 seconds. The maximum standard deviationfor drop times in any fuel cycle was 0.094 seconds. The 15 sets of testdata included data from both 12-month and 18-month fuel cycles. Thus, thisdata indicates that no increase in drop time trend was observed due toeither lengthening the operating cycles or to increased periods betweensurveillance testing from 12 to 18 months. The licensee's analysis of previous fuel cycle CEA drop time measurements,which showed no adverse affects when shifting from a 12-month to an 18-monthcycle, as well as the other surveillance requirements that are performedto determine CEA drop time, indicate that the CEA drop time should notbe appreciably affected by the proposed 6-month extension of the surveillanceperiod of the TS 4.1.3.4.c to 24 months. Hence, the probability or consequencesof previously evaluated accidents would not be significantly increased.Also, the licensee has proposed a 6-month extension in the surveillanceinterval of TS 4.3.3.2.b for performing incore detector channel calibrations.The incore detector channel calibration excludes the neutron detectorsbut includes all electronic components. The channel calibration consistsof two parts: (1) a resistance check of the cable from the computer terminationto the reactor core, and (2) a check of the ability of the computer toread a known voltage level. The resistance check verifies cable integrity.A review of resistance checks performed since the initial startups of CalvertCliffs Units 1 and 2 has been conducted. No evidence of cable degradationwas found. However, all of the in-containment cable is being replaced withenvironmentally qualified cable. The design specification for the new cablewill ensure that it is at least as reliable as the cable it replaces. Thesecond part of the channel calibration checks the computer's ability toread a known voltage level. Three known signals are input into the computer:(1) a short circuit, (2) a 150 millivolt signal, and (3) a 250 millivoltsignal. Proper computer readings are verified for each test with the voltagesbeing between andplusmin;2 millivolts. Other checks to verify proper computeroperation are also performed and include CRT and alarm printer verification.Test data from the initial units' startups to the present has been reviewedto determine if performance changed in an adverse manner over time andwith the shift from a 12-month to an 18-month operating cycle. The licenseenoted no adverse trends and found that all tests had been consistentlysatisfactory. In addition, performance of the power distribution TS Surveillance Requirements4.2.2.1.2 and 4.2.3.2, which are at least once per 31 mode 1 days, providesfurther assurance of the operability of the incore detection system. Thelicensee states that if the incore detector system was to be inoperable,other methods are employed to carry out its monitoring and calibrationfunctions. The licensee's analysis of previous fuel cycle incore detection systemcalibration data, which showed no adverse trends when shifting from a 12-monthto an 18-month cycle, as well as the power distribution surveillance requirementsthat are imposed at least once every 31 days of mode 1 operation, indicatethat the operability of the incore detectors should not be appreciablyaffected by the proposed 6-month extension to 24 months of the surveillanceinterval of TS 4.3.3.2.b for performing incore detector channel calibrations.Hence, the probability or consequences of previously evaluated accidentswould not be significantly increased. (ii) Create the possibility of a new or different type of accident fromany accident previously evaluated... The proposed changes only extend the surveillance intervals for CEA droptime testing and incore detector calibrations. This proposal does not changeany system design or facility operation; therefore, it does not createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previouslyevaluated. (iii) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety... The margins of safety that could be potentially affected by these changesincluded the margin from reactor coolant system overpressurization andthe margins from peak centerline temperature (PCT) and from the depaturefrom nucleate boiling (DNB), due to a possible decrease in the negativereactivity insertion rate on a reactor trip and from inaccurate flux monitioringdue to degradation in the incore detectors. However, a review of plant surveillance history shows that: (1) both ofthese systems (CEAs and incore detectors) have been extremely reliable,and (2) the surveillance results of both systems have routinely yieldedexcellent results that were independent of the time between surveillances(cycle length). In addition, in both cases there exists other TS surveillancerequirements that monitor CEA and incore detector performance and wouldmost likely indicate any ongoing degradation in either system, thus mitigatingany potential hazards presented by extending the surveillances intervals.Therefore, this change does not involve any significant reduction in amargin of safety. Based upon the above, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the proposedchanges to TS Surveillance Requirements 4.1.3.4.c and 4.3.3.2.b involveno significant hazards considerations. Change No. 3 proposes to modify the Units 1 and 2 TS SRs 4.7.11.1.1.f.3,for cycling fire suppression water system flow path valves that are nottestable during plant operation, and 4.7.11.4.b, for the inspection, re-rackingand replacement of degraded coupling gaskets for fire hoses inside containment,by extending their associated surveillance intervals from at least onceevery 18 months to at least once per refueling interval (24 months). The interval for these surveillances is 18 months which corresponds tothe current refueling cycle. The extension of the surveillance intervalto 24 months is requested to facilitate a 24-month operating cycle. The licensee evaluated the proposed change against the standards in 10CFR 50.92 and has determined that the amendment would not: (i) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated... The proposal to modify TS Surveillance Requirement 4.7.11.1.1.f.3 affectsonly two fire suppression water system valves inside containment. LCO 3.7.11.1.cat all times requires an operable fire suppression water system flow paththat takes a suction from the water storage tanks and transfers the waterthrough the distribution system up to the first valve before the waterflow alarm device on each sprinkler, hose standpipe or spray system riser.All valves in this flow path can be tested during unit operation with theexception of the two valves inside containment (the motor operated containmentisolation valve and a manual block valve). TS Surveillance Requirement4.7.11.1.1.f.3 requires these two valves to be tested by cycling and verifyingflow. The licensee's results from a review of plant history indicate thatthere has never been a failure of either valve to perform adequately. Thelicensee further states that there is no evidence that a 6-month extensionin this surveillance interval between valve cycles would adversely impactvalve operation. Hence, the probability or consequence of previously evaluatedaccidents would not be significantly increased by the proposed 6-monthextension of the surveillance interval of TS 4.7.11.1.1.f.3. The proposed modification of TS Surveillance Requirement 4.7.11.4.b wouldaffect only the inspection and reracking of fire hoses inside containment.A review of previously conducted containment fire hose inspections revealedno failures of the fire hoses. The licensee states that these results wereexpected as it has been a licensee policy to replace all fire hoses insidecontainment on a three-year frequency. The licensee intends, for the 24-monthoperating cycle, to hydrostatically test or replace all containment firehoses every two years. Furthermore, test results have shown that the hose coupling gasket materialhas not degraded significantly over the three-year interval between hosereplacements. Finally, during hose inspection, there has never been evidenceof hose mildew, rot or similar damage due to chemicals, abrasion, moistureor normal wear. Thus, it is unlikely that the containment fire hoses wouldexperience any significant degredation over the proposed 6-month surveillanceinterval extension. Hence, the probability or consequences of the proposedchange to TS 4.7.11.4.b would not significantly increase the probabilityor consequences of any previously evaluated accidents. (ii) Create the possibility of a new or different type of accident fromany accident previously evaluated... These proposed changes do not create the possibility of any new or differentaccidents as no plant modifications or changes in system operation or surveillancetesting, other than test interval, shall be made. (iii) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety... Extending the surveillance interval for these two tests does not involvea significant reduction in any margin of safety. Efforts were made to extendthe surveillance interval of only those tests that could not be performedduring unit operation (i.e., testing and inspecting fire hoses and firesuppression water system valves inside containment). These containmentfire protection components are generally inaccessible during unit operation,and so, will be tested during refueling outages. However, the likelihoodof a fire inside containment during unit operation is much smaller thanduring outage work periods. Thus, the likelihood of a fire occurring insidecontainment that would damage safety and safety-related systems will notbe significantly increased by this proposed 6-month test interval extension.Therefore, the margins of safety provided by these safety and safety-relatedsystems will not be significantly reduced. Based upon the above, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the proposedchanges to TS SRs 4.7.11.1.1.f.3 and 4.7.11.4.b involve no significanthazards considerations. Change No. 4 proposes to renumber the Units 1 and 2 TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.f.3as 4.7.11.1.1.g.2 and TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.g as 4.7.11.1.1.g.1 and to modifythe Units 1 and 2 TS SRs 4.7.11.1.1.g, 4.7.11.2.b andamp; c and 4.7.11.4.cby making administrative or more restrictive changes to the current surveillancerequirements. The proposed restrictive changes to the surveillance requirementsare as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) the surveillance interval for performing a fire suppression watersystem flow test in accordance with TS 4.7.11.1.g would be changed to ``atleast once per refueling interval'' (24 months) from the currently required``at least once per 3 years,'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) the spray and sprinkler system cycling test of each flow pathvalve would be conducted at least every 12 months. Currently, only testablevalves are required to be cycled at least every 12 months by TS 4.7.11.2.b,whereas TS 4.7.11.2.c.1.b requires the cycling of those not testable duringplant operation at least every 18 months. All of these valves, however,are testable during plant operation, making TS 4.7.11.2.c.1.b superfluous.Consequently, the licensee has proposed deletion of TS 4.7.11.2.c.1.b andof the word ``testable'' from the phrase ``by cycling each testable valve''in TS 4.7.11.2.b, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) fire hose station valve operability and hose hydrostatic testscurrently are required by TS 4.7.11.4.c to be performed at least once per3 years. The licensee has proposed that these tests on fire hose stationsinside containment be required to be performed at least once during refuelinginterval (24 months). </ITAG>On March 6, 1986, the NRC published guidance in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 7751) concerning examples of amendmentsthat are not likely to involve a significant hazard consideration. Two of the examples were ``(i) A purely administrative change to technicalspecifications: for example, a change to achieve consistency throughoutthe technical specifications, correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature''and ``(ii) A change that constitutes an additional limitation, restriction,or control not presently included in the technical specifications, e.g.,a more stringent surveillance requirement.'' These proposals are such administrativeand more restrictive changes as they simplify the TS to better reflectplant conditions and also, require surveillances to be performed more frequently.Based upon the above, the NRC staff agrees with the licensee's evaluationand proposes to determine that the proposed changes to TS 4.7.11.1.1.f.3,4.7.11.1.1.g, 4.7.11.2.b. andamp; c and 4.7.11.4.c involve no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Calvert County Library, PrinceFrederick, Maryland. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay E. Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-254 and 50-265, Quad CitiesNuclear Power Station, Units 1 and 2, Rock Island County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 6, 1987 as supplementedby December 16, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Tables 3.2-1 and 4.2-1 of the Quad Cities, Units 1 and 2, TechnicalSpecifications (TS) for High Pressure Core Injection (HPCI) and ReactorCore Isolation Cooling (RCIC) Systems Steam Line High Flow Indication Instrumentation.More specifically, a TS amendment was requested that would: (1) revisethe number of operable or tripped HPCI and RCIC steam line high flow indicationinstrument channels from a minimum of four (4) channels to two (2) channels;this will correct a discrepancy that has existed since the original TSwere issued, by making the number of channels consistent with the originaldesign basis and actual plant configuration, and (2) revise the HPCI andRCIC high steam flow time delay setting of 3 andgreater; t andgreater; 10 secondsto a more conservative setting of 3 andgreater; t andgreater; 9 seconds; thischange was recommended by the Commonwealth Edison Company (CECo, the licensee)Engineering Department based upon General Electric (GE) Company analysis.Additionally, the TS amendment would correct a typographical error in theassociated surveillance requirement bases. Current TS for Units 1 and 2identify the high steam flow instruments as 1-2389 A thru D and 2-2389A thru D, while the correct designations are 1-2352, 1-2353, 2-2352 and2-2353. The low pressure instruments are listed as 1-2352, 1-2353, 2-2352and 2-2353 in the Units 1 and 2 TS, while the correct designations are1-2389 A thru D and 2-2389 A thru D. Instrument numbers for the high steamflow instrumentation were actually the designations for the low pressureinstrumentation while the instrument numbers for the low pressure instrumentation,are actually the designations for the HPCI high steam flow instruments.Revising these instrument designations is considered to be an administrativechange. The application for amendment was originally noticed in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(52 FR 45884) on December 2, 1987. CECo supplementedtheir initial submittal on December 16, 1987 to incorporate the proposedtime delay setting into applicable surveillance requirements of Table 4.2-1.This revised time delay setting for TS table 4.2-1 had been inadvertentlyomitted from the November 6, 1987 application for amendment. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazards consideration if operation of the facility in accordance with theproposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated; or (2)create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. In accordance with 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee hasprovided the following analysis in their amendment application addressingthese three standards. CECo has analyzed this proposed amendment and determined that operationof the facility, in accordance with the proposed amendment, would not:<ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated because: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Previously evaluated accidents were based on two channels for theRCIC and HPCI steam line flow indications rather than four; this meansthat the evaluations were based on conditions that actually exist in theplant, not the number of channels found in the current Technical Specifications.Plant operations and accident analyses are not changed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The proposed time delay setting is lower than the setting whichcurrently exists. Operating with a maximum time delay setting of nine secondsis more conservative that the previously approved ten second value. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Changing instrument designation to correct typographical errorsare considered to be an administrative change and has no effect upon previouslyevaluated accident scenarios. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated because: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The number of HPCI and RCIC instrument channels are corrected toreflect the number of channels that actually exist, and upon which theoriginal system design was based. The manner in which the plant has been,or will be operated does not change. Additionally, operating with a minimumnumber of two tripped or operable HPCI or RCIC high flow instrument channelsis more conservative than with four channels. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The new time delay setting is more conservative than the valuethat currently exists in the Quad Cities TS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Correction of typographical errors are considered to be administrativein nature and have no effect on plant operation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety because:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The number of HPCI and RCIC instrument channels are corrected toreflect actual plant configuration and original design. There are no changesbeing made to hardware. The proposed amendment does not reduce the marginof safety since the minimum number of operable or tripped channels willbe more conservative. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The new maximum time delay setting will be more conservative thanthe value currently in TS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Correction of typographical errors involve the designation forHPCI instrumentation only, safety margins are unaffected. </ITAG>The Commission has reviewed the licensee's TS amendment request and concurswith their analysis for no significant hazards consideration determination.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine the aforementioned amendmentrequest does not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennephin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esq. of Isham, Lincoln,andamp; Beale at Three First National Plaza, Suite 5200, Chicago, Illinois60602. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-254 and 50-265, Quad CitiesNuclear Power Station, Units 1 and 2, Rock Island County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 22, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Technical Specifications (TS) 3.2.D.3 (refueling floor radiationmonitor setpoint) and associated bases, and TS 6.2.C.1 (review responsibilitiesfor changes to procedures). Current TS establish a trip setpoint of 100 mR/hr for refueling floor radiationmonitors. Commonwealth Edison Company (CECo, the licensee) has proposedrevising this setpoint to ``less than or equal to 100mR/hr'' in order toprevent possible inadvertent trips during instrument calibration. Theseradiation monitors are calibrated to 100 mR/hr which does not allow fornormal instrument setpoint drift if the TS trip setpoint is also at 100mR/hr. Instead of allowing review and approval responsibilities to be split upamong various subject areas as required by present TS, the proposed amendmentwould prescribe that all procedure changes ``shall be reviewed and approvedby the Technical Staff Supervisor, the Assistant Superintendent, and departmenthead...''. Altering review and approval responsibilities for changes toprocedures (identified in TS Section 6.A and 6.B), in this fashion, shouldincrease consistency and improve uniformity for all areas of plant activities.Furthermore, this proposed amendment will also elevate review responsibilityto a higher level of management. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazards consideration if operation of the facility in accordance with theproposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated; or (2)create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. In accordance with 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee hasprovided the following analysis in their amendment application addressingthese three standards. CECo has analyzed this proposed amendment and determined that operationof the facility, in accordance with the proposed amendment, would not:<ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated because the proposed amendment merelyestablishes an upper bound limit for the refuel floor radiation monitorsconsistent with what currently exists in the Tech Specs. This is consideredto be a change in the conservative direction and will not effect systemdesign or safety function. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment also raises the level of reviews for procedurechanges to the Assistant Superintendent level for all procedures identifiedin Section 6.2.A. and 6.2.B. of the TS. This change results in a higherlevel of approval for changes to procedures than is currently providedin the TS. This change is considered to be administrative in nature andshould improve the quality of plant procedures used to operate the station.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated because the proposed amendment does notexceed the existing setpoint for refuel floor radiation monitors, but rathermakes 100mR/hr the upper bounding value. There are no hardware changes,nor are there any new modes of operation associated with this amendment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Revised review and approval responsibilities for procedures changeswould be an administrative change. No new equipment or modes of operationhave been introduced as a result of this TS revision. Revising the authorizationlevel for procedure changes to a higher level does not introduce any newequipment or modes of operation at Quad Cities Station. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety becausethe setpoint of 100mR/hr is not being changed to a different value, butrather is becoming an upper bounding value for the refuel floor radiationmonitors. This will prevent inadvertent trips which may occur because ofnormal instrument drift and unnecessary system challenges. Any deviationfrom the 100mR/hr setpoint allowed by the proposed TS change would resultin an increased margin (i.e. radiation level setpoint is only allowed tobe lowered). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 6 revisions are considered to be administrative in nature.This TS revision being proposed does not result in hardware modificationsthat would effect the way plant systems are being operated. </ITAG>The Commission has reviewed the licensee's TS amendment request and concurswith their analysis for no significant hazards consideration determination.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine the aforementioned amendmentrequest does not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennephin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esq. of Isham, Lincoln,andamp; Beale at Three First National Plaza, Suite 5200, Chicago, Illinois60602. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Consumers Power Company, Docket No. 50-255, Palisades Plant, Van BurenCounty, Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 26, 1987. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed change would revisethe license condition for the receipt, possession and use of byproduct,source and special nuclear material in accordance with a standard, generalizedformat that allows flexibility in amounts of such material in support ofreactor operation. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The licensee has evaluated this proposed amendment for determiningwhether or not it involves a significant hazards consideration as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The control of byproduct, source or special nuclear material sourcesexceeding 100 millicuries is by approved Radiological Services Departmentprocedures which contain information described in Regulatory Guide 1.70.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The ability to handle sources has been demonstrated at Palisades sincethe Provisional Operating License was issued. Personnel qualifications,facilities, and equipment and procedures for handling have also been established.Surveillance leak testing to determine source leakage was incorporatedinto the Technical Specification, Section 6.21, approved in Amendment No.98. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The amount of reactor fuel which can be received, possessed, and usedmay vary from the present license limit but will be limited by availablestorage and amounts required for operation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration atPalisades as this change would not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. This change revises the license conditionsfor the amount of special nuclear material, source material, and byproductmaterial in accordance with the NRC's letter of January 24, 1975, withsome modification. Provisions to ensure reactor fuel is limited to amountscompatible with the present possession amounts are controlled by the amountof storage space and fuel necessary for reactor operation as describedin the FSAR. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The sources will be adequately leak tested, stored and used and recordswill be maintained as required by the Technical Specification, Section6.21. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. Appropriate controls for receipt, handlingand storage of the special nuclear material, byproduct material and sourcematerial are in place and remain unchanged as a result of this requestto ensure no new or different accident will be created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The controlsover the receipt, handling and storage remain unchanged as a result ofthis request. These controls will ensure no safety margin is reduced. </ITAG>The Palisades Plant Review Committee has reviewed this Technical SpecificationChange Request and has determined that this change involves no significanthazards consideration. The Commission's staff has reviewed the licensee's evaluation and agrees.The staff therefore proposes to determine that this proposed amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Van Zoeren Library, HopeCollege, Holland, Michigan 49423. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Judd L. Bacon, Esq., Consumers Power Company,212 West Michigan Avenue, Jackson, Michigan 49201. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Martin J. Virgilio. <ITAG tagnum="84">General Public Utilities Nuclear Corporation, Docket No. 50-320, ThreeMile Island Nuclear Station Unit 2 (TMI-2), Dauphin County, Pennsylvania</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 23, 1987, revised October 26,1987, November 9, 1987, and December 4, 1987. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise TMI-2 Operating License No. DPR-73 by modifying Appendix A TechnicalSpecifications Sections 2 - Safety Limits, 3 - Limiting Conditions forOperation, 3/4 - Basis for Limiting Conditions for Operations and SurveillanceRequirements, and 6 - Administrative Controls. Additionally, the proposalwould amend the Index. The proposed amendment would extensively revisethe TMI-2 Technical Specifications to align license requirements appropriateto current, as well as future, plant conditions through the remainder ofthe current cleanup operations. At the end of the current cleanup operationsthe licensee plans to place the facility into a post-defueling monitoredstorage condition (PDMS). The proposed amendment allows for the transitionfrom the current defueling phase through the completion of defueling andoffsite fuel shipment by the incorporation of technical specificationsthat are applicable during specific phases or modes of the cleanup. Certaintechnical specifications are retained during the entire transition periodwhile others are phased out or modified as the cleanup progresses. Phase-outof specific requirements would be dependent on the status of the cleanupas defined by the facility mode. Three cleanup modes are proposed: Mode 1 - The current condition, during which defueling and other majortasks are in progress. Mode 2 - The period subsequent to defueling of the reactor vessel and thereactor coolant system but prior to completion of the core debris shippingprogram. The possibility of criticality in the Reactor Building (RB) isprecluded and no canisters containing core material are in the RB. Mode 3 - The period subsequent to shipment of the remaining core materialoffsite. Thirty days prior to an anticipated change in mode, the licensee proposesto submit to the NRC a report which provides the basis for the transition.As noted above the licensee has defined Mode 1 as the current cleanup conditionand Mode 2 would begin following the completion of defueling. The licensee'sMode 1 defueling program is expected to result in the removal of greaterthan 99% of the reactor fuel. During Mode 1 all technical specificationrequirements, with one exception, currently in the license would be maintained.This exception involves the licensee's proposal to immediately delete therequirement for NRC approval prior to changes in their Radiation ProtectionPlan. After the transition from Mode 1 to Mode 2 the systems and requirementsfor monitoring and protecting the reactor core are no longer needed andthe licensee proposes their deletion. The Borated Water Injection Capability,Reactor Coolant System Water Control, Reactor Coolant System TemperatureControl and Neutron Monitoring are examples of systems and monitoring capabilitywhich would no longer be needed. Additionally, the requirement for licensedoperators would no longer be needed once the core material is removed.Also, the licensee proposes to delete the requirement for preapproval ofprocedures by the NRC. The transition from Mode 2 to Mode 3 would further reduce the operabilityrequirements for certain plant systems. For example, with the removal offsiteof all of the defueled core material, the requirements to maintain a specificwater level and boron concentration for Spent Fuel Pool 'A' would be deleted.Additionally, limitations on crane operation inside the Fuel Handling Buildingwould be deleted and the requirement for the collection of meteorologicaldata would be eliminated from the Technical Specifications. The licensee also proposes a number of administrative changes to the TechnicalSpecifications. Sections that have been deleted in previous license amendmentswould be completely removed from the Technical Specifications and no mentionof their past incorporation in the license would appear in the amendedTechnical Specification. Section 2, Safety Limits, previously deleted,would be revised to state that there are no safety limits applicable toTMI-2. The licensee also proposes to revise the Technical SpecificationIndex to be consistent with the deletions. No extensive renumbering ofthe remaining technical specifications is proposed. The licensee proposes to change the applicability of Technical Specifications3.3.3.1, Radiation Monitoring Instrumentation; 3.3.3.8, Fire DetectionInstrumentation; 3.6.1.4, Internal Pressure; 3.6.3.1, Containment PurgeExhaust System; 3.7.6.1, Flood Protection; 3.7.9, Sealed Sources; 3.7.10.1,Fire Suppression Water System; 3.7.10.2, Deluge/Sprinkler Systems; 3.7.10.4,Fire Hose Stations; 3.7.11, Penetration Fire Barriers; 3.9.12.1, Fuel HandlingBuilding Air Cleanup Exhaust System; 3.9.12.2, Auxiliary Building Air CleanupExhaust System and 3.9.13, Accident Generated Water from ``Recovery Mode,''which is the current term for the ongoing cleanup operations, to ``Modes1, 2, 3'' which is the licensees' proposed terminology for the remainderof the current cleanup effort. Accordingly, there would be a change inthe terminology but not in the applicability of the requirements. To parallelthis change the licensee proposes to delete from section 1.3 the definitionof ``Recovery Mode'' and replace it with the three modes discussed above.A revised definition of ``Containment Integrity'' (Section 1.7) is proposed.The new definition is consistent with the current definition but has beenmodified to define specific criteria under which double valve isolationexternal to containment would be allowed due to the unique circumstancesof TMI-2. These criteria are similar to those which fall under the presentprovision of allowing double valve isolation outside containment in accordancewith NRC approval. A new definition of ``Containment Isolation'' (Section 1.21) has been addedto the Definitions Section. The licensee proposes to add this definitionto support the addition of Technical Specification 3.6.1.2. Containmentisolation requirements have been added for Modes 2 and 3 to provide provisionsfor maintaining the containment as a contamination barrier during thesetwo facility modes. The licensee proposes to change the phase ``Recovery Mode'' to ``FacilityMode'' in Section 3.0.1, Limiting Conditions for Operation, to reflectthe use of modes in the applicability of certain Technical Specifications.Proposed changes to Technical Specification 3.1.1.1, Borated Cooling WaterInjection, incorporate a minimum temperature requirement in the actionstatement and applicability of this specification only during Mode 1. Boratedcooling water injection capability to the Reactor Coolant System (RCS)to eliminate the possibility of an inadvertent criticality is only applicableif there is fuel in the RCS. Once Mode 1 defueling is completed there isno requirement for borated water injection. The minimum temperature requirementwas added to the action statement to be consistent with the minimum temperaturerequirements elsewhere in the specification. The licensee proposes to make Technical Specification 3.1.1.2, Boron ConcentrationReactor Coolant System, applicable only during Mode 1. Boration of theRCS is for the prevention of an inadvertent criticality. Once Mode 1 defuelingis completed the possibility of an inadvertent criticality is eliminated,therefore, boration of the RCS is unnecessary. The licensee proposes to modify Technical Specification 3.1.1.3, Fuel TransferCanal and Fuel Storage Pool A Boron Concentration, which currently specifiesboration of the Fuel Transfer Canal and the Spent Fuel Storage Pool ``A''by removing the requirement for boration of the Spent Fuel Pool and placingit in a new section 3.1.1.4, Boron Concentration-Spent Fuel Pool ``A'',and making the remainder of 3.1.1.3, pertaining only to the fuel transfercanal, and applicable only during Mode 1. Once Mode 1 defueling is completedthere is no further need for the fuel transfer canal and therefore, noboration requirements are necessary to avert criticality. During Mode 2there may still be canisters containing core debris in the Spent Fuel Pool``A''. Therefore, there would be a continuing requirement to maintain borationof the fuel pool. The proposed section 3.1.1.4, pertaining only to SpentFuel Pool ``A'' would be applicable during Modes 1 and 2. The licensee proposes to make Technical Specification 3.3.1.1, Intermediateand Source Range Neutron Flux Monitors, applicable only during Mode 1.Once Mode 1 defueling is completed, the shutdown status of the core isassured and the basis for maintaining these monitors no longer exists.The licensee also proposes to delete from the action statement the requirementthat a Special Report be submitted if the monitors are inoperative. Accordingto 10 CFR 50.73, a licensee is required to submit a Licensee Event Report(LER) when a Technical Specification Action Statement has not been satisfied.The requirement for a special report is redundant with the requirementsunder 10 CFR 50.73. The LER would contain the same information as requiredby the Special Report. Technical Specifications 3.3.2, Engineered Safety Feature Actuation System(ESFAS) Instrumentation, would be deleted by the licensee. The currenttechnical specification requires the operability of one ESFAS channel relatedto the automatic starting of the diesel generators with loss of offsitepower. Amendment 27 deleted the operability requirements for the dieselgenerators. There is no longer a basis for maintaining the ESFAS Instrumentationoperable. The licensee proposes to change the applicability of Technical Specification3.3.3.4, Meteorological Instrumentation, from Recovery Mode to Modes 1and 2 and the time clock in the action statement would be changed fromeight hours to seven days. The potential off-site consequences of the worstcase accident during Mode 3, a fire in the reactor building, is boundedby the numerical guidelines of 10 CFR 50 Appendix I. Since the basis forrequiring meteorological data is to evaluate the need for initiating protectivemeasures to protect the health and safety of the public and the worst caserelease is less than the releases permitted under Appendix I no protectivemeasures would be necessary. Therefore there would be no requirement tomaintain meteorological instrumentation for TMI-2. Changing the actionstatement requiring an inoperable meteorological monitoring channel tobe restored within a specified period of time from 8 hours to 7 days isconsistent with the requirements of the Bandamp;W Standard Technical Specificationsand the TMI-2 pre-accident Technical Specification. The requirement forthe eight hour timeclock was incorporated in Technical Specification 3.3.3.4by the NRC Amendment of Order dated February 11, 1980. At the time of thisOrder, the Reactor Building contained high concentration of radioactiveKrypton-85, as well as many other radionuclides. In the event of a leakfrom the facility it would have been and has been important to have operablemeteorological instrumentation to assess the consequences of the release.As the cleanup progresses the magnitude of potentially airborne radionuclidesin the facility that could be released to the environment has been substantiallyreduced. Therefore, the licensee concludes that the original need for therapid restoration of meteorological data channels no longer exists. The licensee proposed to change Technical Specification 3.3.3.5, EssentialParameter Monitoring Instrumentation. The specification currently requiresthe monitoring of the following essential parameters: (1) reactor buildingpressure, (2) reactor vessel water level, (3) incore temperature, (4) reactorbuilding water level, (5) borated water storage tank level, (6) steam generatorlevel, (7) spent fuel storage pool ``A'' water level, and (8) fuel transfercanal (deep end) water level. The licensee proposed to make parameters 3, 4, 5 and 6 applicable onlyto Mode 1. The requirements for reactor building pressure (1 above) hasbeen transferred to Section 4.6.1.4.a of the Recovery Operations Plan.The requirement for reactor vessel water level (2 above) has been transferredto technical specification 3.4.2, the requirement for spent fuel storagepool ``A'' water level (7 above) has been transferred to technical specification3.9.1 and the requirement for fuel transfer canal (deep end) (8 above)has been transferred to technical specification 3.9.3. Once the reactorvessel has been defueled there is no requirement for monitoring incoretemperature, reactor building water level, borated water storage tank levelor the steam generator level. Technical Specification 3.3.37, Chlorine Detection Systems would be modifiedby the licensee by making the specification applicable only during Mode1. Chlorine detection is required to protect the inhabitants of the controlroom. An accidental chlorine release would be detected promptly and theControl Room Emergency Ventilation System would automatically isolate thecontrol room and initiate recirculation. Manning the control room willonly be required during Mode 1 (see proposed changes to Section 6.2.2 below).Once the fuel has been removed from the RCS the requirement for manningthe control room with licensed operators will be deleted. Therefore, themaintenance of the Chlorine Detection System would be unnecessary. The licensee proposes to change the applicability of Technical Specification3.4.2, Reactor Vessel Water Level Monitoring, from Recovery Mode to Mode1. The reactor vessel water level monitor ensures that indication is availableto monitor for changes in the reactor vessel water level. This device provideswarning of a leak in the RCS inventory that could result in a boron dilutionevent. Once defueling of the reactor vessel is completed it is no longernecessary to maintain water in the reactor vessel, consequently, the capabilityto monitor the water level is no longer required. The licensee proposes to change the applicability of Technical Specification3.4.9 Pressure/Temperature Limits from Recovery Mode to Mode 1. The currentspecification states that the RCS shall remain open to the reactor buildingatmosphere and that repressurization shall only be allowed following NRCapproval. Temperature limits on the RCS are specified to prevent precipitationof the boron or boiling of the Reactor coolant. Once Mode 1 defueling iscompleted there would be no requirement to maintain a specific boron concentrationor a potential source of heat to cause boiling. Consequently, the capabilityto monitor the RCS water temperature and RCS pressure would not be required.Technical Specification 3.5.1 Control Room Communications presently requirethat direct communications between the control room or the communicationcenter and personnel in the reactor building be maintained. The licenseeproposed to make this requirement applicable only during Mode 1 when corealterations are being made. The current specification states that it isapplicable during core alterations. Once the licensee completes Mode 1defueling there will no longer be any core, therefore, core alterationswould not be possible and this requirement would not be necessary. The licensee proposes to change Technical Specification 3.6.1.1, ContainmentIntegrity, the current specification is applicable during the RecoveryMode the licensee has proposed making it applicable only during Mode 1.Once Mode 1 defueling is completed double containment isolation would nolonger be required since the maximum possible release of radionuclidesdue to the worst case accident, a fire inside containment, would be lessthan the 10 CFR 50 Appendix I numerical guidelines. The licensee proposesto further modify the specification by allowing modifications to containmentpenetrations provided that a single isolation barrier is maintained. Ifno isolation barriers are provided the action statement requires the cessationof any activity inside the reactor building that could result in a radiationrelease. Technical Specification 3.6.1.3, Containment Air Locks (Mode 1), wouldbe modified by the licensee to be applicable only during Mode 1. The specificationrequires the operability of each air lock and both air lock doors. If anair lock is inoperable the requirement is to maintain at least one doorclosed and repair the air lock to operable status within 24 hours. OnceMode 1 defueling is completed the source term for an inadvertent releaseof radioactivity to the environment is substantially reduced, consequently,the need to restore the air lock to operable status would not be required.The licensee proposes to add Technical Specification 3.6.1.2, ContainmentIsolation. The proposed Technical Specification would require primary containmentisolation during Modes 2 and 3. The specification would provide an appropriateprovision for maintaining the containment as a contamination barrier subsequentto Mode 1 defueling. There would no longer be a requirement for doubleisolation of penetrations. The licensee also proposes to add Technical Specification 3.6.1.6, ContainmentAir Locks (Modes 2 and 3). Each containment air lock would be consideredoperable with at least one air lock door operable during Modes 2 and 3.This would provide an appropriate containment barrier subsequent to defueling.There would no longer be a requirement for double isolation capabilityfor the air locks. Technical Specification 3.6.1.5, Air Temperature specifies the primarycontainment average air temperature. The licensee proposes to make thisspecification applicable only during Mode 1. The purpose of this specificationis to insure that the life of instrumentation and equipment installed inthe containment is maximized, and that the boron in the RCS will remainin solution preventing the possibility of recriticality. Once defuelingis completed there will no longer be the requirements for the operabilityof most of the instrumentation and equipment, and boration of the RCS,consequently, the requirement to maintain containment temperature withina specified range is not required. The licensee proposes to modify Technical Specification 3.7.7.1, ControlRoom Emergency Air Cleanup System by changing the applicability from RecoveryMode to Mode 1. The Control Room Emergency Air Cleanup System is requiredto be maintained operable to protect control room operators in the eventof an accident and to maintain control room habitability in the event ofchemical releases. Once Mode 1 defueling is completed there will be norequirement to man the control room (see proposed changes to Section 6.2-2),consequently maintenance of control room habitability is not required.Technical Specification 3.7.10.3, Halon System, protects circuits and equipmentrequired for safe shutdown and core protection in specific areas of theplant from the propagation of a fire. The licensee proposes to change theapplicability of this specification from Recovery Mode to Mode 1. OnceMode 1 defueling is completed there will be no circuits or equipment necessaryfor the protection of the core. The licensee proposes to change the applicability of Specification 3.8.1A.C. Sources, 3.8.2, Onsite Power Distribution Systems, and 3.8.2.3, DCDistribution. The licensee proposes to change the applicability from RecoveryMode to Mode 1. The purpose of these specifications is to assure that thepower sources and associated distribution systems are available to supplythe safety related equipment required to maintain the unit in a stablecondition following the March 28, 1979 accident. Once Mode 1 defuelingis completed no safety related equipment will be required to maintain theunit in a safe and stable condition, consequently, the power sources anddistribution systems would not be required. The licensee also proposesto administratively renumber specifications 3.8.2.1.b, and 3.8.2.3 and3.8.2.2.1 respectively. Technical Specifications 3.9.1, Spent Fuel Pool ``A'' Water Level Monitoringand 3.9.2 Spent Fuel Pool ``A'' Water Level require monitoring of the waterlevel in the spent fuel pool and maintenance of a level specified in theRecovery Operations Plan. The licensee proposes to establish the applicabilityto these two specifications to Modes 1 and 2. Spent Fuel Storage Pool ``A''is used to store defueling canisters containing core material prior toshipment offsite. While canisters are in storage in the spent fuel poolthe fuel pool will be flooded and borated. Once all canisters have beenremoved from the TMI site the spent fuel pool will no longer be used, consequently,monitoring and maintenance of a specific water level would no longer berequired. The licensee proposes to change Technical Specifications 3.9.3, Fuel TransferCanal (Deep End) Water Level Monitoring, and 3.9.4, Fuel Transfer Canal(Deep End) Water Level, by establishing the applicability of the specificationsto Mode 1. The Fuel Transfer Canal is used to transfer defueling canistersfrom the reactor building to the fuel handling building. While transferstake place the Fuel Transfer Canal is flooded and borated to protect personnelfrom radiation. Once Mode 1 defueling is completed the Fuel Transfer Canalwill no longer be needed to transfer defueling canisters and, therefore,monitoring and maintenance of a specific water level would no longer berequired. Technical Specification 3.10.1, Crane Operations-Containment Building,delimits load travel within containment. The license proposes to changethe applicability of the specification from Recovery Mode to Mode 1. Thebasis for this specification is to prevent a load drop into the reactorvessel causing a reconfiguration of the core debris and/or structural damagewhich could hinder defueling. Once Mode 1 defueling is completed the basisfor controlling heavy loads inside the containment will be eliminated andthe specification will no longer be required. The licensee proposes to change the applicability of Technical Specification3.10.2, Crane Operations-Fuel Handling Building, from Recovery Mode toModes 1 and 2. The basis for this specification is to prevent a load dropin the Fuel Handling Building causing damage to canisters containing corematerial. Subsequent to Modes 1 and 2 all core material will have beenshipped off-site. Thus, the basis for controlling heavy loads inside theFuel Handling Building is eliminated and the specification is not required.The licensee proposes to clarify the applicability of portions of TechnicalSpecification 6.2-2, TMI-2 Organization. Specification 6.2.2 specifies,in part, the staffing required by 10 CFR 50.54 paragraphs (m)(2) (ii) and(m)(2)(iii) for fueled nuclear power plants. Subsequent to Mode 1 defuelingTMI-2 will no longer be considered fueled and the licensee proposes thatthe requirements for licensed operators will no longer apply. Furthermore,the current specification states that a licensed operator would be in thecontrol room when there is fuel in the reactor. The licensee proposes thatspecifying the applicability to only Mode 1, when there is fuel in thereactor, is an administrative change consistent with NRC regulations. Specification6.2.2.C states that an individual qualified in radiation protection proceduresshall be on site when fuel is in the reactor. The licensee proposes tochange the wording of this specification to ``During Mode 1, an individualqualified in radiation protection procedures shall be onsite when fuelis in the reactor.'' The licensee proposes to limit the applicability of Technical Specification6.8.2.2, Procedures, to Mode 1. The current Technical Specification requiresNRC review and approval of all procedures and changes thereto which alterthe distribution or processing of a quantity of radioactive material therelease of which could cause the magnitude of radiological releases toexceed 10 CFR 50 Appendix I limits. Once Mode 1 defueling is completedthe potential source term within the reactor building and the maximum credibleaccident, a fire, would not result in a maximum dose to an individual fromfission products and transuranics in excess of 10 CFR Appendix I limits.Although during Mode 2 there will be defueling canisters containing significantamounts of fuel still onsite the licensee is of the opinion that thesecanisters have proven to be effective in preventing inadvertent criticality.Furthermore, potential accident scenarios associated with these canistershave shown that they provide adequate protection for the public. The licensee proposes to change Technical Specification 6.11, RadiationProtection Program, by deleting the requirement for NRC approval of theRadiation Protection Plan. Removal of this requirement is based on thepast performance of the licensee in the area of radiation protection andthe desire to remove the NRC from the procedure review and approval cycleat TMI-2. It is also consistent with the Standard Technical Specificationsfor Babcock and Wilcox plants. Auditing by the NRC of the Radiation ProtectionPlan and licensee compliance with the plan would continue. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated, or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. TMI-2 is in a long-term cold shutdown for accident recovery. Short-livedfission products which make up the preponderance of the source term foroperating reactors have decayed to negligible levels. The decay heat producedby the core has now dropped to less than 10 kilowatts and forced coolingof the core has not been required or used since 1981. Consequently, inprevious license amendments, the staff has determined that the potentialaccidents analyzed for TMI-2 in the current mode are bounded in scope andseverity by the range of accidents originally analyzed in the facilityFSAR. The changes proposed by the licensee are changes to the Appendix A TechnicalSpecifications. They consist primarily of specifying the circumstancesunder which the existing Specifications are applicable and improving theclarity of the requirements. The proposed changes do not significantlyincrease the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluatedbecause no changes to current safety systems or setpoints are proposedwhile there is still sufficient fuel in the RCS to cause a criticalityevent. No active systems are required to maintain TMI-2 in its currentsafe shutdown condition. Once Mode 1 defueling is completed the possibilityof an offsite release of radiation in excess of 10 CFR 50 Appendix I limitsis greatly reduced. Those systems necessary to monitor the core and facilitatedefueling will no longer be required. Maintenance of these systems willno longer be necessary. The proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated because no newmodes of operation or new equipment are being introduced. Deletion of monitoringrequirements cannot create the possibility of any new or different kindof accident. Deletion of safety systems designed to protect the core oncethe core is removed cannot increase the probability of accidents. The proposedchanges represent a gradual reduction in the scope of license requirementsand are consistent with the changing status of the facility as the cleanupprogresses. The proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety, because, as mentioned perviously, no active components are requiredto maintain the current safe shutdown of TMI-2. Furthermore, as the cleanupprogresses the margin of safety increases. Once Mode 1 defueling and Mode2 offsite shipment is completed there will be a significant increase inthe margin of safety. Based on the above considerations, the staff proposes to determine thatthe proposed changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>State Library of PennsylvaniaGovernment Publications Section, Education Building, Commonwealth and WalnutStreets, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17126. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW. Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>William D. Travers <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-321, EdwinI. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Unit 1, Appling County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>July 13, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This amendment would modifya provision of Section 1.II of the Hatch Unit 1 Technical Specifications(TS) which limits the operating cycle length for instrument and electricalsurveillance. The existing TS 1.II limits the operating cycle intervalto 15 months as regards instrument and electrical surveillance. The proposedchange would define the operating cycle interval as 18 months instead of15 months and would delete the reference to electrical and instrumentationsurveillance. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR Part 50.92(c)). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The Standard Technical Specifications (STS) include a Surveillance FrequencyNotations table (Table 1.1) which defines a refueling cycle interval as18 months. A copy of this table is incorporated in the TS for Hatch Unit2. However, the Hatch Unit 1 TS, which are in an earlier ``custom'' TS,have a Section 1.II defining ``Surveillance Frequency'' in which it isstated that: ``The operating cycle interval as pertaining to instrumentand electrical surveillance shall never exceed 15 months.'' The terms operatingcycle and refueling cycle are synonymous. Thus, the 15-month operatingcycle for Unit 1, as specified in TS 1.II, is more restrictive than the18-month refueling cycles specified in the STS and in the Hatch Unit 2TS. Further complicating matters, Amendment 110 to the Hatch Unit 1 TSadded a Table 1.1, ``Frequency Notations,'' in which a refueling cycleinterval is specified as 18-months. However, Section 1.II was not changed.Thus, the Unit 1 TS are internally inconsistent. The licensee proposesto change the words in Hatch Unit 1 definition of Surveillance Frequencyto: ``The operating interval is defined as 18-months.'' This change wouldremove the internal inconsistency and would adjust the operating cyclefor Hatch Unit 1 to the same 18-month period allowed for Unit 2. The licensee states that the actual plant trip setpoints for instrumentsand electrical equipment are set conservative to the TS allowable values,such that the allowable values are not compromised during an operatingcycle by instrument drift. Extending the allowable time between refuelingsto 18 months instead of 15 months would require an adjustment to the actualtrip setpoints, but would not affect the TS allowable setpoints. Thus,this change would not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Further, since thedesign functions of the electrical and instrument systems are not affectedby this change, the change would not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Finally,margins of safety are not significantly reduced by the proposed changesince the TS allowable setpoints are unchanged. On the basis of the above, the Commission has determined that the requestedamendment meets the three criteria and, therefore, has made a proposeddetermination that the amendment application does not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Appling County Public Library,301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Bruce W. Churchill, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Lawrence P. Crocker, Acting Project Director<ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile Island NuclearStation, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 9, 1987 (TSCR 173) <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldremove the Radiological Environmental Monitoring Program (REMP) from theTechnical Specifications. In addition, the REMP would be changed to: (a)permit monitoring frequencies to be changed to calendar periods such asweekly, monthly, etc; (b) increase the time from 30 days to 60 days forreporting environmental samples exceeding the reporting levels; and (c)make typographical and administrative changes. The REMP will continue tobe required by the Technical Specifications even though it is not in theTechnical Specifications. Future changes to the REMP that would reducethe effectiveness of the REMP are required to be reviewed and approvedby NRC prior to implementation by the licensee. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The licensee proposed Technical Specification Change Request (TSCR)No. 173 to remove the REMP from the Technical Specifications although theREMP will still be required by the Technical Specifications. It has evaluatedTSCR 173 to determine if a significant hazards consideration exists. Theresults of this evaluation are given below in terms of the criteria in10 CFR 50.92(c): <ITAG tagnum="21">Removal of the Radiological Environmental Monitoring Program (REMP)from the Technical Specifications reduces the size of the Technical Specificationswithout impacting the effectiveness of the REMP. The changes to the REMPare administrative with one noted change to the reporting requirementsof the REMP. The REMP will continue to be required by technical specificationeven though 10 CFR 50.36a does not require the REMP to be in the technicalspecifications. The REMP is a reformatted version of the technical specificationit replaces. The information and specific requirements of the program areessentially the same as the former technical specification with the followingexceptions: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Monitoring frequencies that are specified in a specific numberof days has been changed to a calendar period such as weekly, monthly,etc. as appropriate. Other minor changes have been made to be more consistentwith NUREG-0472 and the Branch Technical Position. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Typographical errors have been corrected. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. A reporting requirement for environmental samples exceeding thereporting levels as specified in Table 2 has changed. This was changedfrom 30 to 60 days to allow adequate time for laboratory analysis of samples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Safety and safety controls shall remain unaffected. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Future changes that reduce the effectiveness of this initially approvedREMP shall be reviewed and approved by the NRC prior to implementationby GPUN. This is required by Technical Specification 6.15. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Future changes that do not reduce the effectiveness of the REMP shallbe submitted to the NRC for review in the Annual Radiological EnvironmentalOperating Report for the period in which the changes were made. These changeswill be fully reviewed and approved by GPUN management consistent withreview and approval procedures, prior to implementation. This is requiredby Technical Specification 6.5. </ITAG>GPUN has determined that this technical specification change request posesno significant hazards as defined by the NRC in 10 CFR 50.92. Since this change is administrative: A. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrenceor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The technical specificationchanges are administrative and do not affect plant equipment. The resultsof this change will not impact the safety of the plant or the public health.Therefore, the technical specification change for the Radiological EnvironmentalMonitoring Program does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityof occurrence or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. B. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not create the possibility of a new or different kind of affect fromany accident previously evaluated since it does not affect plant equipment.Therefore, it is concluded that the technical specification change forthe Radiological Environmental Monitoring Program does not create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.C. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. All safetycriteria as described in the former technical specification bases are preservedin the Radiological Environmental Monitoring Program. Therefore, it is concluded that the technical specification change forthe Radiological Environmental Monitoring Program does not involve a significantreduction in a margin of safety. We agree with GPU's conclusion that this license amendment request involvesno significant hazards considerations in that operation of TMI-1 in accordancewith the proposed amendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofany accident previously evaluated; or 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The REMP will remain as a functional program and we can perceive at thistime no significant hazard from removing the REMP from the Technical Specifications.Adjustments to monitoring frequencies and one reporting requirement areminor and insignificant in terms of plant safety and public health. Futurechanges to the REMP that would reduce its effectiveness are required tobe approved by NRC prior to implementation. The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendment involves no significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Education Building, Commonwealth and WalnutStreets, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17126 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Shaw, Pittman, Potts,and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 10, 1987. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed change would reviseTechnical Specification 3.5.2, ECCS Subsystems - Tavg Greater than 350anddegrees;F and Technical Specification 3.5.3, ECCS Subsystems - Tavg Less than 350anddegrees;F by adding a note to the Applicability section of both Technical Specificationsto indicate that two ECCS subsystems are required to be operable when theRCS average temperature is equal to or greater than 500anddegrees; F. Technical Specification 3.5.2 currently requires two independent emergencycore cooling system (ECCS) subsystems to be operable when the reactor isin Modes 1, 2 and 3; however, the requirements of this Technical Specificationin Mode 3 are applicable only if the pressurizer pressure is equal to orgreater than 1750 psia. The proposed change will add a note to the Mode3 applicability statement that will require both ECCS subsystems to beoperable any time the RCS average temperature is equal to or greater than500anddegrees; F, regardless of the pressurizer pressure. Technical Specification 3.5.3 currently requires one ECCS subsystem tobe operable if the reactor is in Modes 3 and 4 with a Mode 3 requirementthat the pressurizer pressure is less than 1750 psia. The proposed changeto this Technical Specification is similar to the proposed change to TechnicalSpecification 3.5.2 in that a note will be added to the Mode 3 applicabilitystatement that requires the RCS average temperature to be less than 500anddegrees;F before it is acceptable to have only one ECCS subsystem in service. The reason for the proposed change to these Technical Specifications isto ensure that at least one train of high pressure safety injection (HPSI)is available (even if a single failure is assumed) to mitigate the consequencesof a postulated steam line break (SLB) accident initiated from an RCS averagetemperature of 500anddegrees; F or greater. The Cycle 2 safety analysis hasshown that borated water from HPSI is required to prevent the core frombecoming critical during the uncontrolled RCS cooldown (associated witha SLB) from greater than 500anddegrees; F. In addition, the proposed change will also revise the title of the subjectTechnical Specifications such that they will be described in terms of modesof operation rather than average coolant temperature. <T3>Basis for Proposed No Significant Hazards Considerations Determination:</T3>The NRC staff proposes that the proposed change does not involve asignificant hazards consideration because, as required by the criteriaof 10 CFR 50.92(c), operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of any accident previously evaluated; or (2) Create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.The basis for this proposed finding is given below. (1) The proposed change will require that two ECCS subsystems are operablewhenever the average temperature of the RCS is equal to or greater than500anddegrees; F. This will ensure that, even if one ECCS subsystem is assumedto fail, one train of HPSI will be available to inject borated water intothe RCS during an SLB. As described in the safety analysis for Cycle 2,borated water (from HPSI) is required to mitigate the reactivity transientassociated with the RCS cooldown and prevent the core from returing toa critical condition. Below 500anddegrees; F the RCS cooldown (and associatedreactivity transient) during the SLB is less severe and HPSI flow is notrequired to maintain the core subcritical. Therefore, since the proposedchange reduces the consequences of a SLB it will not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of any accident previouslyevaluated. (2) The proposed change does not involve any physical changes to plantsystems, structures or components nor will there be any significant changesto plant operating procedures. The proposed change will simply clarifythe RCS conditions which must exist prior to taking one of the ECCS subsystemsout of service. Thus, the proposed change will not create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.(3) The intent of this Specification is to ensure there will be sufficientemergency core cooling capability available in the event of a LOCA anda coincident single failure that results in the complete loss of one ECCSsubsystem. The proposed change will not affect the LOCA analysis sinceit merely adds a restriction that requires both ECCS subsystems to be operablewhenever the RCS temperature is equal to or greater than 500anddegrees; F.This additional restriction ensures that sufficient borated water can beadded to the RCS to mitigate the reactivity transient associated with theuncontrolled RCS cooldown that occurs during a steam line break. Sincethe proposed change adds a restriction that was not already a part of theTechnical Specifications and since this restriction ensures that the consequencesof a broader range of steam line breaks can be mitigated, the proposedchange will result in an increase in the margin of safety. The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of standardsfor determining whether significant hazards consideration exists by providingcertain examples (52 FR 7751) of amendments that are considered not likelyto involve significant hazards consideration. Example (ii) relates to achange that constitutes an additional limitation, restriction, or controlnot presently included in the Technical Specifications, (e.g., a more stringentsurveillance requirement). In this case, the proposed change is similar to Example (ii) in that itconstitutes an additional restriction (i.e., RCS temperature) that mustbe satisfied before it is acceptable to have only one ECCS subsystem inservice. The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationanalysis. Based on the review and above discussions, the staff proposesto determine that the proposed change does not involve a significant hazardsconsideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Bruce W. Churchill, Esq., Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N St., NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-410, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 2, Scriba, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 16, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the allowable value and isolation trip setpoints for the reactorcore isolation cooling (RCIC) high steam line flow. As noted in the TechnicalSpecifications, the existing values are preliminary with the actual valuesto be determined during the startup test program. The proposed changesare based on system testing during the startup test program. The proposedamendment is in accordance with the licensee's application of November16, 1987. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsiderations if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The proposed changes will not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated for the following reasons:<ITAG tagnum="21">The RCIC Steam Line break analysis assumes that the system will isolatewhen the steam flow reaches 300% of rated steam flow. This change to theTechnical Specification assures that the as-built plant is in agreementwith the design basis. Revising the setpoint to the as-built conditionsequivalent to the 300% rated flow value assures that a RCIC steam linebreak will be detected and isolated in accordance with the requirementsof GDC 54 without impacting the qualification or operation of other safetysystems or safe shutdown of the plant. The new setpoint is conservativerelative to the old setpoint. In summary, this change will not involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes will not create the possibility or a new or differentkind of accident previously evaluated for the following reasons: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The reactor building response to previously evaluated accidents remainswithin previously assessed limits of temperature and pressure. Further,all safety-related systems and components remain within their applicabledesign limits. Thus, system and component performance is not adverselyaffected by this change, thereby assuring that the design capabilitiesof those systems and components are not challenged in a manner not previouslyassessed so as to create the possibility of a new or different kind ofaccident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition, since the design basis for RCIC system isolation hasnot changed, the environmental qualification of plant equipment is notadversely affected by this proposed amendment, further assuring that componentsare not challenged in a manner not previously assessed. In summary, theproposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes will not involve a significant reduction in amargin of safety for the following reasons: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change will not cause existing Technical Specificationoperational limits or system performance criteria to be exceeded. The proposedchange ensures that the system design requirements are met. Allowancesfor instrument drift, instrument accuracy, and calibration capability havebeen maintained in accordance with Bases Section B3/4.3.2 of the TechnicalSpecifications. Therefore, the proposed change does not result in a significantreduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>Based upon the above considerations, the staff proposes to determine thatthe proposed changes do not constitute a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Penfield Library, State UniversityCollege, Oswego, New York 13126. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Mark Wetterhahn, Esq., Conner andamp;Wetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 4, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would revise TechnicalSpecification Section 3/4.3.2 to delete the chlorine detection system.The chlorination systems at Millstone Unit Nos. 1, 2 and 3 have been modifiedto use sodium hypochlorite instead of gaseous chlorine. This has resultedin the elimination of on-site bulk storage of liquid chlorine and the possibilityof an on-site chlorine release. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>In accordance with 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has reviewed the proposedchanges and has concluded that the amendment does not involve a significanthazards consideration because the change would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously analyzed. The potential for a chlorine release affectingcontrol room habitability no longer exists since the chlorine rail carshave been removed from the Millstone site. Thus, removal of the requirementson the chlorine detection system will not increase the consequences ofany event. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anypreviously analyzed. There are no changes in the way the plant is operated.No new failure modes are introduced. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Control roomhabitability is not affected because on-site chlorine bulk storage hasbeen eliminated, the number of chlorine rail, truck, and barge shipmentsdoes not exceed the levels discussed in Regulatory Guide 1.78, and thecredible off-site chlorine bulk storage facilities are at least 5 milesdistant from the site. The proposed changes do not affect the consequencesof any accident previously analyzed. The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittal and concurs with its nosignificant hazards determination. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andHoward, One Constitution Plaza, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application complies with the standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriatefindings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulationsin 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility OperatingLicense and Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determinationand Opportunity for Hearing in connection with these actions was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as indicated. No request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene was filed following this notice. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationsfor amendments, (2) the amendments, and (3) the Commission's related letters,Safety Evaluations and/or Environmental Assessments as indicated. All ofthese items are available for public inspection at the Commission's PublicDocument Room, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the local publicdocument rooms for the particular facilities involved. A copy of items(2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to the U.S. NuclearRegulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director, Divisionof Reactor Projects. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, Dockets Nos. 50-325 and 50-324,Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County, NorthCarolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>November 25, 1985 and supplementedOctober 15, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendment relocates a footnotefrom item 1.c.1 of Table 3.3.2-1 to item 1.c.1 of Table 4.3.2-1, therebyensuring that the required surveillance testing of mechanical pumps isidentified. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Amendments Nos.: </T3>115 and 142 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. </T3>Amendment revisesthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>January 29, 1986 (51 FR 3710) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 30, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. The October 15, 1987 letter provided corrected technical specificationpages that did not change the initial determination of no significant hazardsconsideration as published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 28, 1987 <T3>Description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the TechnicalSpecifications to incorporate additional action steps describing stepsoperators should take if core flow and power do not meet the definitionof recirculation system operability and to change the surveillance requirementsto require that baseline average power range monitor and local power monitorneutron flux noise levels be established after each refueling outage. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Amendments Nos.: </T3>114 and 141 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. </T3>Amendmentsrevise the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>June 17, 1987 (52 FR 23097) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 30, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-321 and 50-366,Edwin I. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Appling County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>October 8, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments modify the TechnicalSpecifications defining fuel Average Planar Linear Heat Generation Ratelimits and Emergency Core Cooling System surveillance requirements. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 21, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 21, 1987 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>150 and 87 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-57 and NPF-5. </T3>Amendments revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 18, 1987 (52 FR 44244) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 21, 1983. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Appling County Public Library,301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 <ITAG tagnum="84">Indiana and Michigan Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-315 and 50-316,Donald C. Cook Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Berrien County, Michigan</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 9, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revised the TechnicalSpecifications by deleting the provision that the auxiliary building cranemain hoist be deenergized and the load blocks unloaded whenever the craneis moved over the spent fuel assemblies in the spent fuel pool. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 17, 1987. <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 17, 1987. <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>113 and 96. <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-58 and DPR-74. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>January 28, 1987 (52 FR 2883) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 17, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Maude Preston Palenske MemorialLibrary, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085 <ITAG tagnum="84">Indiana and Michigan Power Company, Docket No. 50-316, Donald C. CookNuclear Plant, Unit No. 2, Berrien County, Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 28, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the provisionsin the Technical Specifications to extend 18-month surveillances from December31, 1987 to the refueling outage currently scheduled to begin in early1988 for response-time testing for reactor trip and engineering safetyfeatures (ESF) instrumentation; response testing of equipment to ESF signals;reactor vessel level indication calibration; auxiliary feedwater systemtesting, including channel functional testing of loss of main feedwaterpump signal; and diesel generator testing, including relief valve testingand essential service water valve testing. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 28, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 28, 1987 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>97 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-74. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 27, 1987 (52 FR 45413) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 28, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. Theproposed amendment was noticed with an opportunity for prior hearing. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Maude Preston Palenske MemorialLibrary, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085 <ITAG tagnum="84">Mississippi Power andamp; Light Company, System Energy Resources, Inc.,South Mississippi Electric Power Association, Docket No. 50-416, GrandGulf Nuclear Station, Unit 1, Claiborne County, Mississippi </ITAG><T3>Dates of applications for amendment: </T3>October 17, 1986 and August6, 1987, as supplemented December 15, 1987. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The August 6, 1987 applicationfor license amendment requested changes to the Technical Specifications(TS), Appendix A to the operating license, in eight areas: (1) a clarificationto the definition of secondary containment integrity; (2) a change in thename of a supporting organization represented on the Safety Review Committee;(3) a nomenclature change for a secondary containment isolation valve;(4) deletion of the manual initiation handswitch calibration requirementfor ECCS pumps; (5) deletion of expired footnotes; (6) a change to reflectnew upper containment pool gates; (7) a change to add certain smoke detectors;and (8) a modification to the setpoint for residual heat removal (RHR)/reactorcore isolation cooling (RCIC) steam line high flow. These changes are madein this amendment. The October 17, 1986 application for license amendmentrequested four changes to the TS. Three of the changes were made in Amendment29 to the operating license, issued March 31, 1987. The fourth requestedchange, the addition of TS for smoke detectors in the control rod driverepair room, is made in this amendment. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Amendment No. </T3>42 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-29. </T3>This amendment revisesthe Technical Specifications and the Environmental Protection Plan. <T3>Dates of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>September 23, 1987 (52 FR 35796) The December15, 1987 letter provided supplemental information which did not changethe initial determination of no significant hazards considerations as publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated December 30, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Hinds Junior College, McLendonLibrary, Raymond, Mississippi 39154 <ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 20, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications relating to design features of the fuel storage facilities.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 21, 1987. <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 21, 1987. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>113 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-46. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4> November 18, 1987 (52 FR 44246). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 21, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-245, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 1, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 20, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>To reflect deletion of low reactorpressure permissive switches from the emergency core cooling system (corespray and low pressure coolant injection) pump start logic. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 17, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 17, 1987 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>13 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-21. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 13, 1987 (52 FR 43694). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 17, 1987 <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut. <ITAG tagnum="84">Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, VermontYankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 16, 1987 <T3>Brief Description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes TechnicalSpecifications to clarify and enhance limiting conditions of operationand surveillance requirements pertaining to the standby liquid controlsystem. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>30 days from date of issuance <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>102 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-28: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 12, 1987 (52 FR 7700) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 30, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Brooks Memorial Library,224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301. <ITAG tagnum="84">Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, VermontYankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 28, 1987 as clarifiedby letter dated November 2, 1987. <T3>Brief Description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications to reflect administrative changes to Section 6 of the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 29, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 29, 1987 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>101 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-28: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>September 23, 1987 (52 FR 35808) and renoticedon November 18, 1987 (52 FR 44247). The Commission's related evaluationof the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated December 29,1987 <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Brooks Memorial Library,224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301. <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE ANDFINAL DETERMINATION OF NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION AND OPPORTUNITYFOR HEARING (EXIGENT OR EMERGENCY CIRCUMSTANCES) </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application for the amendment complieswith the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, asamended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commissionhas made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission'srules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the licenseamendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the datethe amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish,for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Considerationof Issuance of Amendment and Proposed No Significant Hazards ConsiderationDetermination and Opportunity for Hearing. For exigent circumstances, theCommission has either issued a <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice providing opportunity for public commentor has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surroundinga licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission'sproposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commissionhas provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, usingits best efforts to make available to the public means of communicationfor the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments,the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licenseehas been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted,for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in preventionof either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up tothe plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunityto provide for public comment on its no significant hazards determination.In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunityfor comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment.If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, theState has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediatelyeffective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearingfrom any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any requiredhearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards considerationis involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made afinal determination that the amendment involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documentsrelated to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued andmade effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationfor amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3)the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or EnvironmentalAssessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspectionat the Commission's Public Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington,DC, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved.A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respectto the issuance of the amendments. By February 12, 1988, the licensee mayfile a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendmentto the subject facility operating license and any person whose interestmay be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a partyin the proceeding must file a written petition for leave to intervene.Requests for a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene shall be filedin accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic LicensingProceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If a request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or anAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by theChairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on therequest and/or petition and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safetyand Licensing Board will issue a notice of hearing or an appropriate order.As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceedingand how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested,it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held wouldtake place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW.,Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during thelast ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitionerpromptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to WesternUnion at (800) 325-6000 (in Missouri (800) 342-6700). The Western Unionoperator should be given Datagram Identification Number 3737 and the followingmessage addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel-Bethesda, U.S. Nuclear RegulatoryCommission, Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee.Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or theAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or request shouldbe granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v)and 2.714(d). <ITAG tagnum="84">Mississippi Power andamp; Light Company, System Energy Resources, Inc.,South Mississippi Electric Power Association, Docket No. 50-416, GrandGulf Nuclear Station, Unit 1, Claiborne County, Mississippi </ITAG><T3>Dates of application for amendment: </T3>August 13, 1987, as revisedOctober 23, November 25, December 22, and December 27, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment provides interimchanges to the Technical Specifications for the standby liquid controlsystem and the ATWS recirculation pump trip system to reflect modificationsmade to conform to 10 CFR 50.62 regarding anticipated transients withoutscram (ATWS). <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 30, 1987 <T3>Amendment No. </T3>41 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-29: </T3>This amendment revisesthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 4, 1987 (52 FR 46136) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances,and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are containedin a Safety Evaluation dated December 30, 1987. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comment received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Hinds Junior College, McLendonLibrary, Raymond, Mississippi 39154. <ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 21, 1987. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications to extend the secondary containment isolation logic functionaltest interval from six months to eighteen months. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 22, 1987. <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 22, 1987. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>114 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-46. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. Public comments requested as to proposed no significanthazards consideration: No. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergencycircumstances, consultation with State of Nebraska, and final determinationof no significant hazards consideration are contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 22, 1987. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. G. D. Watson, Nebraska Public PowerDistrict, Post Office Box 499, Columbus, Nebraska 68601 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo Dated at Bethesda, Maryland this 7th day of January 1988. <T3>For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission </T3><ITAG tagnum="6">Steven A. Varga, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director, Division of Reactor Projects-I/II, Office of Nuclear ReactorRegulation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[Doc. 88-523 Filed 1-12-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-D  </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>